Maryland, session 2026, SB0054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
2–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners.
(d) “License” means a license to practice veterinary medicine in the State.
– 1 –

Ch. 48 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(h) “Veterinarian” means any person who is a graduate of a college of veterinary
medicine.
(i) “Veterinary practitioner” means a licensed and registered veterinarian
engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine.
2–310.
(A) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE Board may
refuse, suspend, or revoke any application or license, and censure or place on probation any
licensee after a hearing, if the veterinarian or veterinary practitioner:
(1) Is unable to practice veterinary medicine competently due to a physical
or mental disability;
(2) Is convicted of a violation of any federal or State law relating to
prescription drugs, a controlled dangerous substance under Title 5, Subtitle 4 of the
Criminal Law Article, or a controlled substance as defined by 21 U.S.C. § 812;
(3) Is convicted of a felony, or of a crime involving moral turpitude;
(4) Is convicted of violating any provision of this subtitle, any unlawful or
fraudulent practice, or any fraudulent, misleading, or deceptive representation or
advertising concerning his professional qualifications or the quality of materials or drugs
used by him in his professional work or in the treatment of animals;
(5) Has a final judgment entered against him in a civil malpractice case
involving gross personal negligence;
(6) Obtains the license by fraud or misrepresentation, either in the
application, or in passing the examination;
(7) Is guilty of employing or permitting to practice veterinary medicine any
person who does not hold a license to practice veterinary medicine in the State;
(8) Fails to comply with Board rules or regulations after receiving a license;
(9) Is grossly negligent or deliberately cruel to an animal;
(10) Is determined by four members to be professionally incompetent as a
veterinary practitioner;
(11) Is disciplined by a licensing authority of another state, including the
suspension or revocation of a license to practice veterinary medicine, for an act that would
be grounds for disciplinary action under this section;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 48
(12) Fails to comply with animal cruelty or animal fighting reporting
requirements under § 2–313.1 of this subtitle; or
(13) Willfully violates the cat declawing prohibition under § 2–313.3 of this
subtitle.
(B) THE BOARD MAY NOT SUSPEND OR REVOKE A LICENSE, REPRIMAND OR
CENSURE A LICENSEE, OR PLACE A LICENSEE ON PROBATION SOLELY ON THE BASIS
OF THE LICENSEE DISCUSSING OR RECOMMENDING THE USE OF CANNABIS, AS
DEFINED IN § 1–101 OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE, OR
A PRODUCT THAT CONTAINS CANNABIDIOL ON AN ANIMAL FOR POTENTIAL
THERAPEUTIC EFFECT OR HEALTH SUPPLEMENTATION PURPOSES.
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) (1) “Cannabis” means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of the
plant, including all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of
isomers, whether growing or not, with a delta–9–tetrahydrocannabinol concentration
greater than 0.3% on a dry weight basis.
(2) “Cannabis” includes cannabis products, seeds, seedlings, immature
plants, and clones.
(3) “Cannabis” does not include hemp or hemp products, as defined in §
14–101 of the Agriculture Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 3 –